New York, session 2025-2026, A9494.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 230.21 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by 2 a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the criminal procedure law relat- 3 ing to the removal of actions to certain courts in an adjoining county, 4 as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8312 and A. 7563, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 § 230.21 Removal of action to certain courts in an adjoining county. 7 1. In any county outside a city having a population of one million or 8 more, the court may, upon motion of the defendant and with consent of 9 the district attorney and the district attorney of the adjoining county 10 that has a superior court designated a human trafficking court, veterans 11 treatment court, or mental health court by the chief administrator of 12 the courts, order that the indictment and action be removed from the 13 court in which the matter is pending to such human trafficking court, 14 veterans treatment court, or mental health court, whereupon such court 15 may then conduct such action to judgment or other final disposition; 16 provided, however, that no court may order removal to a veterans treat- 17 ment court of a family offense charge described in subdivision one of 18 section 530.11 of this chapter pursuant to this section where the 19 accused and the person alleged to be the victim of such offense charged 20 are members of the same family or household as defined in such subdivi- 21 sion one of section 530.11; [and] provided further that an order of 22 removal issued under this subdivision shall not take effect until five 23 days after the date the order is issued unless, prior to such effective 24 date, the human trafficking court, veterans treatment court, or mental 25 health court notifies the court that issued the order that: (a) it will 26 not accept the action, in which event the order shall not take effect, 27 or (b) it will accept the action on a date prior to such effective date, 28 in which event the order shall take effect upon such prior date; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11230-02-6 A. 9494 2 1 provided further that, for mental health court transfers, the receiving 2 court shall coordinate with the local governmental unit, as the term is 3 defined in section 41.03 of the mental hygiene law, of the defendant's 4 county of residence for the planning and delivery of treatment services. 5 2. Upon providing notification pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of 6 subdivision one of this section, the human trafficking court, veterans 7 treatment court, or mental health court shall promptly give notice to 8 the defendant, the defendant's counsel and the district attorney of both 9 counties. 10 3. In the event the defendant fails to comply with or complete the 11 mental health court program, jurisdiction and responsibility for further 12 proceedings shall revert to the original court of record. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 14 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the criminal procedure 15 law relating to the removal of actions to certain courts in an adjoining 16 county, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8312 and A. 7563, 17 takes effect.